West Virginia, session 2025, SB379.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Chiropractic Examiners. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on October 18, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-1-24 of this code, relating to the Board of Chiropractic Examiners (consideration of prior criminal convictions in initial licensure determinations, 4 CSR 08), is authorized.